Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-448
Principal, defined.

Any person punishable under this code who:

(1) Commits an offense punishable by the provisions of this code, or aids, abets, counsels, commands, or procures its commission; or

(2) Causes an act to be done which if directly performed by him would be punishable by this code, is a principal.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 48, p. 1574.